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DI088-20

DTC P 1520/95[Stop Light Switch Signal Malfunction (Only
for A/T)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This signal is used to detect when the brakes have been applied. The STP signal voltage is the same as
the voltage supplied to the stop lights.

The STP signalis used mainly to control the fuel cut -offenginespeed (Thefuelcut —offenginespeedisre-
duced slightly when the vehicle is braking.).
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
The stop light switch does notturn off even once the vehicleis * Shortin stop light switch signal circuit
P1520/95 driven * Stop light switch
(2 trip detection logic) *EngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Read freeze frame data using a hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air-fuel ratio was lean or rich, etc. at the time of the
malfunction.

1 Check operation of stop light.

CHECK:
Check if the stop lights go on and off normally when the brake pedal is operated and released.

@

2 | Check STP signal.

NG> Check and repair stop light circuit.

/7 ON When using hand-held tester:

& STP PREPARATION:

(@ Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tes-
ter main switch ON.

CHECK:

Read the STP signal on the hand-held tester.

OK:

C/ Brake Pedal STP Signal
Brake Pedal Brake Pedal

Depressed Released
A
2N U

Depressed ON
Released OFF
When not using hand-held tester:
PREPARATION:

Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Check the voltage between terminal STP of the engine ECU
connector and body ground.

D08198

OK:
Brake Pedal Voltage
Depressed 7.5-14V
Released Below 1.5V

(See page DI-4).

0K> Check for intermittent problems
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3 | Check harness and connector between engine ECU and stop light switch
(See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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